North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-43.3 Aviation Fuel Tax
57-43.3-26.
Inventory gains — Losses.

A supplier or distributor shall take a physical inventory reading of all aviation fuel located in a terminal, underground tank, aboveground tank, railcar, storage tank of a truck, and the storage tank of a bulk delivery truck on a monthly basis and shall report the physical readings, inventory gains, and inventory losses to the commissioner. The inventory reconciliation must include aviation fuel at retail locations and aviation fuel stored in a barrel, drum, or other receptacle. The supplier or distributor with retail locations is exempt from the provisions of subsection 2.

When sold or used by a supplier or distributor, a gain in aviation fuel inventories is subject to the tax imposed by this chapter in the same manner as aviation fuel purchased, imported, or otherwise acquired.

A supplier or distributor is not responsible for the tax imposed by section 57-43.3-02 on any actual loss due to shrinkage or evaporation.

The commissioner may allow a tax credit to a supplier or distributor for actual inventory losses due to casualty loss, subject to the discretion of the commissioner and based on proof of the loss as required by the commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 81; 2007, ch. 539, § 5.

57-43.3-27.
Administration — Assistants and investigations authorized — Rules.

The commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this chapter. The commissioner may employ assistants and conduct investigations as may be necessary for the administration and enforcement of this chapter and may make and enforce reasonable rules relating to the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 82.

57-43.3-28.
Erroneously or illegally collected taxes.

If any taxes, penalties, or interest imposed by this chapter have been erroneously or illegally collected from any person, the commissioner may permit that person to take credit against the tax on a subsequent report for the amount of the erroneous or illegal overpayment. In the alternative, the commissioner shall present a voucher to the office of management and budget for payment of the amount erroneously or illegally collected and a warrant-check must be prepared by that office drawn on the state treasurer payable to that person. The refund must be paid from undistributed funds received from the tax imposed by this chapter and any such refund may not be approved or paid unless it is in an amount that is in excess of five dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 83.